Mississippi, session 2026, HB1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The school board of a local school district, a school district superintendent, an elected or appointed local official, or an employee of a school district may not require a student to wear a face mask, face shield or any other facial covering that fits over the mouth or nose.  However, a parent, in the parent's sole discretion, may allow the parent's child to wear a face mask, face shield or other facial covering that fits over the mouth or nose.  The prohibition in this section does not apply to safety equipment required as part of a course of study consistent with occupational or laboratory safety requirements. SECTION 2. The president of a state institution of higher learning or public community or junior college, an elected or appointed local official, or a policy making body or individual employee of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college may not require a student to wear a face mask, face shield or any other facial covering that fits over the mouth or nose.  However, a student, in the student's sole discretion, may elect to wear a face mask, face shield or other facial covering that fits over the mouth or nose.  The prohibition in this section does not apply to safety equipment required as part of a course of study consistent with occupational or laboratory safety requirements. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.